District of Columbia statutes.
24-453

Severability.

If any section or provision of this subchapter is held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining sections or provisions of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 12, 1976, D.C. Law 1-51, § 4, 22 DCR 5299

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-253.
1973 Ed., § 24-253.